Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska37-342
Leases; lease-purchase agreements; commission; powers; restrictions.

The commission may enter into long-term leases, lease-purchase agreements, or other agreements with private or governmental agencies for the control and use of real estate for state park system purposes. Except as authorized in section 37-907, the commission shall not provide a local governmental subdivision or agency thereof with an indication of intent to incorporate into the state park system any land or facilities owned or developed by such subdivision or agency unless the indication of intent is first approved by the Legislature or, if the Legislature is not in session, the Executive Board of the Legislative Council. When seeking such approval, the commission shall provide the Legislature or, if the Legislature is not in session, the Executive Board of the Legislative Council with the estimated fiscal impact of the incorporation, including the extent to which the costs of the incorporation can reasonably be expected to be paid from cash funds and the extent to which the costs will likely be required to be paid from General Fund appropriations.

Laws 1959, c. 436, § 7, p. 1466;

Laws 1984, LB 967, § 1;

R.S.1943, (1996), § 81-815.27;

Laws 1998, LB 922, § 100;

Laws 2025, LB364, § 1.